California statutes. Penal Code
(c) Whenever the peace officer supervising a participant has reasonable cause to believe that the participant is not complying with the rules or conditions of the program, or that the electronic monitoring
 devices are unable to function properly in the designated place of confinement, the peace officer may, under general or specific authorization of the correctional administrator, and without a warrant of arrest, retake the person into custody to complete the remainder of the original sentence.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the correctional administrator to allow a person to participate in this program if it appears from the record that the person has not satisfactorily complied with reasonable rules and regulations while in custody. A person shall be eligible for participation in a home detention program only if the correctional administrator concludes that the person meets the criteria for release established under this section and that the person’s participation is consistent with any reasonable rules and
 regulations prescribed by the board of supervisors or the administrative policy of the correctional administrator.

(1) The rules and regulations and administrative policy of the program shall be written and reviewed on an annual basis by the county board of supervisors and the correctional administrator. The rules and regulations shall be given to or made available to any participant upon request.

(2) The correctional administrator, or their designee, shall have the sole discretionary authority to permit program participation as an alternative to physical custody. All persons referred or recommended by the court to participate in the home detention program pursuant to subdivision (e) who are denied participation or all persons removed from program participation shall be
 notified in writing of the specific reasons for the denial or removal. The notice of denial or removal shall include the participant’s appeal rights, as established by program administrative policy.

(e) The court may recommend or refer a person to the correctional administrator for consideration for placement in the home detention program. The recommendation or referral of the court shall be given great weight in the determination of acceptance or denial. At the time of sentencing or at any time that the court deems it necessary, the court may restrict or deny the defendant’s participation in a home detention program.

(f) The correctional administrator may permit home detention program participants to seek and retain employment in the community, attend psychological counseling
 sessions or educational or vocational training classes, or seek medical and dental assistance. Willful failure of the program participant to return to the place of home detention not later than the expiration of any period of time during which they are authorized to be away from the place of home detention pursuant to this section and unauthorized departures from the place of home detention are punishable as provided in Section 4532.

(g) As used in this section, “correctional administrator” means the sheriff, probation officer, or director of the county department of corrections.

(h) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, the correctional administrator shall provide the information specified in paragraph (2) regarding persons on involuntary home detention to
 the Corrections Standards Authority, and upon request, shall provide that information to the law enforcement agency of a city or unincorporated area where an office is located to which persons on involuntary home detention report.

(2) The information required by paragraph (1) shall consist of the following:

(A) The participant’s name, address, and date of birth.

(B) The offense committed by the participant.

(C) The period of time the participant will be placed on home detention.

(D) Whether the participant successfully completed the prescribed period of home detention or was returned to a
 county correctional facility, and if the person was returned to a county correctional facility, the reason for that return.

(E) The gender and ethnicity of the participant.

(3) Any information received by a police department pursuant to this subdivision shall be used only for the purpose of monitoring the impact of home detention programs on the community.

(i) It is the intent of the Legislature that home detention programs established under this section maintain the highest public confidence, credibility, and public safety. In the furtherance of these standards, the following shall apply:

(1) The correctional administrator, with the approval of the board of
 supervisors, may administer a home detention program pursuant to written contracts with appropriate public or private agencies or entities to provide specified program services. No public or private agency or entity may operate a home detention program in any county without a written contract with that county’s correctional administrator. However, this does not apply to the use of electronic monitoring by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation as established in Section 3004. No public or private agency or entity entering into a contract may itself employ any person who is in the home detention program.

(2) Program acceptance shall not circumvent the normal booking process for sentenced offenders. All home detention program participants shall be supervised.

(3) (A) All privately operated home detention programs shall be under the jurisdiction of, and subject to the terms and conditions of the contract entered into with, the correctional administrator.

(B) Each contract shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(i) A provision whereby the private agency or entity agrees to operate in compliance with any available standards promulgated by state correctional agencies and bodies, including the Corrections Standards Authority, and all statutory provisions and mandates, state and county, as appropriate and applicable to the operation of home detention programs and the supervision of sentenced offenders in a home detention program.

(ii) A provision
 that clearly defines areas of respective responsibility and liability of the county and the private agency or entity.

(iii) A provision that requires the private agency or entity to demonstrate evidence of financial responsibility, submitted and approved by the board of supervisors, in amounts and under conditions sufficient to fully indemnify the county for reasonably foreseeable public liability, including legal defense costs, that may arise from, or be proximately caused by, acts or omissions of the contractor. The contract shall provide for annual review by the correctional administrator to ensure compliance with requirements set by the board of supervisors and for adjustment of the financial responsibility requirements if warranted by caseload changes or other factors.

(iv) A provision that requires the private agency or entity to provide evidence of financial responsibility, such as certificates of insurance or copies of insurance policies, prior to commencing any operations pursuant to the contract or at any time requested by the board of supervisors or correctional administrator.

(v) A provision that permits the correctional administrator to immediately terminate the contract with a private agency or entity at any time that the contractor fails to demonstrate evidence of financial responsibility.

(C) All privately operated home detention programs shall comply with all appropriate, applicable ordinances and regulations specified in subdivision (a) of Section 1208.

(D) The
 board of supervisors, the correctional administrator, and the designee of the correctional administrator shall comply with Section 1090 of the Government Code in the consideration, making, and execution of contracts pursuant to this section.

(E) The failure of the private agency or entity to comply with statutory provisions and requirements or with the standards established by the contract and with the correctional administrator may be sufficient cause to terminate the contract.

(F) Upon the discovery that a private agency or entity with whom there is a contract is not in compliance pursuant to this paragraph, the correctional administrator shall give 60 days’ notice to the director of the private agency or entity that the contract may be canceled if the specified deficiencies are not
 corrected.

(G) Shorter notice may be given or the contract may be canceled without notice whenever a serious threat to public safety is present because the private agency or entity has failed to comply with this section.

(j) Inmates participating in this program shall not be charged fees or costs for the program.

(k) For purposes of this section, “evidence of financial responsibility” may include, but is not limited to, certified copies of any of the following:

(1) A current liability insurance policy.

(2) A current errors and omissions insurance policy.

(3) A surety bond.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 218, Sec. 6.   (SB 852)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.018.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, this section shall only apply to inmates being held in lieu of bail and on no other basis.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, the board of supervisors of any county may authorize the correctional administrator, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (j), to offer a program under which inmates being held in lieu of bail in a county jail or other county correctional facility may participate in an electronic monitoring program if the conditions specified in subdivision (c) are met.

(c) (1) In order to qualify for participation in an electronic monitoring program
 pursuant to this section, the inmate shall be an inmate with no holds or outstanding warrants to whom one of the following circumstances applies:

(A) The inmate has been held in custody for at least 30 calendar days from the date of arraignment pending disposition of only misdemeanor charges.

(B) The inmate has been held in custody pending disposition of charges for at least 60 calendar days from the date of arraignment.

(C) The inmate is appropriate for the program based on a determination by the correctional administrator that the inmate’s participation would be consistent with the public safety interests of the community.

(2) All
 participants shall be subject to discretionary review for eligibility and compliance by the correctional administrator consistent with this section.

(d) The board of supervisors, after consulting with the sheriff and district attorney, may prescribe reasonable rules and regulations under which an electronic monitoring program pursuant to this section may operate. As a condition of participation in the electronic monitoring program, the participant shall give consent in writing to participate and shall agree in writing to comply with the rules and regulations of the program, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) The participant shall remain within the interior premises of the participant’s residence during the hours designated by the correctional administrator.

(2) The participant shall admit any probation officer or other peace officer designated by the correctional administrator into the participant’s residence at any time for purposes of verifying the participant’s compliance with the conditions of the detention.

(3) The electronic monitoring may include global positioning system devices or other supervising devices for the purpose of helping to verify the participant’s compliance with the rules and regulations of the electronic monitoring program. The electronic devices shall not be used to eavesdrop or record any conversation, except a conversation between the participant and the person supervising the participant to be used solely for the purposes of voice identification.

(4) The correctional administrator in charge of the county correctional facility from which the participant was released may, without further order of the court, immediately retake the person into custody if the electronic monitoring or supervising devices are unable for any reason to properly perform their function at the designated place of home detention, if the person fails to remain within the place of home detention as stipulated in the agreement, or if the person for any other reason no longer meets the established criteria under this section.

(5) A copy of the signed consent to participate and a copy of the agreement to comply with the rules and regulations shall be provided to the participant and a copy shall be retained by the correctional administrator.

(e) The rules and regulations and administrative policy of the program shall be reviewed on an annual basis by the county board of supervisors and the correctional administrator. The rules and regulations shall be given to every participant.

(f) Whenever the peace officer supervising a participant has reasonable cause to believe that the participant is not complying with the rules or conditions of the program, or that the electronic monitoring devices are unable to function properly in the designated place of confinement, the peace officer may, under general or specific authorization of the correctional administrator, and without a warrant of arrest, retake the person into custody.

(g) (1) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the correctional
 administrator to allow a person to participate in this program if it appears from the record that the person has not satisfactorily complied with reasonable rules and regulations while in custody. A person shall be eligible for participation in an electronic monitoring program only if the correctional administrator concludes that the person meets the criteria for release established under this section and that the person’s participation is consistent with any reasonable rules and regulations prescribed by the board of supervisors or the administrative policy of the correctional administrator.

(2) The correctional administrator, or the administrator’s designee, shall have discretionary authority consistent with this section to permit program participation as an alternative to physical custody. All persons approved by the correctional
 administrator to participate in the electronic monitoring program pursuant to subdivision (c) who are denied participation and all persons removed from program participation shall be notified in writing of the specific reasons for the denial or removal. The notice of denial or removal shall include the participant’s appeal rights, as established by program administrative policy.

(h) The correctional administrator may permit electronic monitoring program participants to seek and retain employment in the community, attend psychological counseling sessions or educational or vocational training classes, or seek medical and dental assistance.

(i) Willful failure of the program participant to return to the place of home detention prior to the expiration of any period of time
 during which the participant is authorized to be away from the place of home detention pursuant to this section and unauthorized departures from the place of home detention is punishable pursuant to Section 4532.

(j) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Correctional administrator” means the sheriff, probation officer, or director of the county department of corrections.

(2) “Electronic monitoring program” includes, but is not limited to, home detention programs, work furlough programs, and work release programs.

(k) Notwithstanding any other law, upon request of a local law enforcement agency with jurisdiction
 over the location where a participant in an electronic monitoring program is placed, the correctional administrator shall provide the following information regarding participants in the electronic monitoring program:

(1) The participant’s name, address, and date of birth.

(2) The offense or offenses alleged to have been committed by the participant.

(3) The period of time the participant will be placed on home detention.

(4) Whether the participant successfully completed the prescribed period of home detention or was returned to a county correctional facility, and if the person was returned to a county correctional facility, the reason for the return.

(5) The gender and ethnicity of the participant.

(l) Notwithstanding any other law, upon request of a local law enforcement agency with jurisdiction over the location where a participant in an electronic monitoring program is placed, the correctional administrator may, in the administrator’s discretion and solely for investigatory purposes, provide current and historical GPS coordinates, if available.

(m) A law enforcement agency that does not have the primary responsibility to supervise participants in the electronic monitoring program that receives information pursuant to subdivision (k) shall not use the information to conduct enforcement actions based on administrative violations of the home detention program. An agency
 that has knowledge that the subject in a criminal investigation is a participant in an electronic monitoring program shall make reasonable efforts to notify the supervising agency prior to serving a warrant or taking any law enforcement action against a participant in an electronic monitoring program.

(n) It is the intent of the Legislature that electronic monitoring programs established under this section maintain the highest public confidence, credibility, and public safety. In the furtherance of these standards, the following shall apply:

(1) The correctional administrator, with the approval of the board of supervisors, may administer an electronic monitoring program as provided in this section pursuant to written contracts with appropriate public or private agencies or entities to
 provide specified program services. A public or private agency or entity shall not operate a home detention program pursuant to this section in any county without a written contract with that county’s correctional administrator. A public or private agency or entity entering into a contract pursuant to this subdivision shall not itself employ any person who is in the electronic monitoring program.

(2) Program participants shall undergo the normal booking process for arrestees entering the jail. All electronic monitoring program participants shall be supervised.

(3) (A) All privately operated electronic monitoring programs shall be under the jurisdiction of, and subject to the terms and conditions of the contract entered into with, the correctional
 administrator.

(B) Each contract specified in subparagraph (A) shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(i) A provision whereby the private agency or entity agrees to operate in compliance with any available standards and all state and county laws applicable to the operation of electronic monitoring programs and the supervision of offenders in an electronic monitoring program.

(ii) A provision that clearly defines areas of respective responsibility and liability of the county and the private agency or entity.

(iii) A provision that requires the private agency or entity to demonstrate evidence of financial responsibility,
 submitted to and approved by the board of supervisors, in amounts and under conditions sufficient to fully indemnify the county for reasonably foreseeable public liability, including legal defense costs that may arise from, or be proximately caused by, acts or omissions of the contractor.

(iv) A provision that requires the private agency or entity to provide evidence of financial responsibility, such as certificates of insurance or copies of insurance policies, prior to commencing any operations pursuant to the contract or at any time requested by the board of supervisors or correctional administrator.

(v) A provision that requires an annual review by the correctional administrator to ensure compliance with requirements set by the board of supervisors and for adjustment of the
 financial responsibility requirements if warranted by caseload changes or other factors.

(vi) A provision that permits the correctional administrator to immediately terminate the contract with a private agency or entity at any time that the contractor fails to demonstrate evidence of financial responsibility.

(C) All privately operated electronic monitoring programs shall comply with all applicable ordinances and regulations specified in subdivision (a) of Section 1208.

(D) The board of supervisors, the correctional administrator, and the designee of the correctional administrator shall comply with Section 1090 of the Government Code in the consideration, making, and execution of contracts pursuant to this
 section.

(E) The failure of the private agency or entity to comply with state or county laws or with the standards established by the contract with the correctional administrator shall constitute cause to terminate the contract.

(F) Upon the discovery that a private agency or entity with which there is a contract is not in compliance with this paragraph, the correctional administrator shall give 60 days’ notice to the director of the private agency or entity that the contract may be canceled if the specified deficiencies are not corrected.

(G) Shorter notice may be given or the contract may be canceled without notice whenever a serious threat to public safety is present because the private agency or entity has failed to
 comply with this section.

(H) For purposes of this section, “evidence of financial responsibility” may include, but is not limited to, certified copies of any of the following:

(i) A current liability insurance policy.

(ii) A current errors and omissions insurance policy.

(iii) A surety bond.

(o) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2021.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 218, Sec. 7.   (SB 852)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.02.

The court, or judge thereof, in granting probation to a defendant convicted of any of the offenses enumerated in Section 290 of this code shall inquire into the question whether the defendant at the time the offense was committed was intoxicated or addicted to the excessive use of alcoholic liquor or beverages at that time or immediately prior thereto, and if the court, or judge thereof, believes that the defendant was so intoxicated, or so addicted, such court, or judge thereof, shall require as a condition of such probation that the defendant totally abstain from the use of alcoholic liquor or beverages.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1608.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.03.

(a) In any case in which a defendant is convicted of an offense punishable by imprisonment in the state prison, the court, if it concludes that a just disposition of the case requires such diagnosis and treatment services as can be provided at a diagnostic facility of the Department of Corrections, may order that defendant be placed temporarily in such facility for a period not to exceed 90 days, with the further provision in such order that the Director of the Department of Corrections report to the court his diagnosis and recommendations concerning the defendant within the 90-day period.

(b) The Director of the Department of Corrections shall, within the 90 days, cause defendant to be observed and examined and shall forward to the court his diagnosis and recommendation concerning the disposition of defendant’s case. Such diagnosis and recommendation shall be embodied in a written report and copies of the report shall be served only upon the defendant or his counsel, the probation officer, and the prosecuting attorney by the court receiving such report. After delivery of the copies of the report, the information contained therein shall not be disclosed to anyone else without the consent of the defendant. After disposition of the case, all copies of the report, except the one delivered to the defendant or his counsel, shall be filed in a sealed file and shall be available thereafter only to the defendant or his counsel, the prosecuting attorney, the court, the probation officer, or the Department of Corrections.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), the probation officer may retain a copy of the report for the purpose of supervision of the defendant if the defendant is placed on probation by the court. The report and information contained therein shall be confidential and shall not be disclosed to anyone else without the written consent of the defendant. Upon the completion or termination of probation, the copy of the report shall be returned by the probation officer to the sealed file prescribed in subdivision (b).

(d) The Department of Corrections shall designate the place to which a person referred to it under the provisions of this section shall be transported. After the receipt of any such person, the department may return the person to the referring court if the director of the department, in his discretion, determines that the staff and facilities of the department are inadequate to provide such services.

(e) The sheriff of the county in which an order is made placing a defendant in a diagnostic facility pursuant to this section, or any other peace officer designated by the court, shall execute the order placing such defendant in the center or returning him therefrom to the court. The expense of such sheriff or other peace officer incurred in executing such order is a charge upon the county in which the court is situated.

(f) It is the intention of the Legislature that the diagnostic facilities made available to the counties by this section shall only be used for the purposes designated and not in lieu of sentences to local facilities.

(g) Time spent by a defendant in confinement in a diagnostic facility of the Department of Corrections pursuant to this section or as an inpatient of the California Rehabilitation Center shall be credited on the term of imprisonment in state prison, if any, to which defendant is sentenced in the case.

(h) In any case in which a defendant has been placed in a diagnostic facility pursuant to this section and, in the course of his confinement, he is determined to be suffering from a remediable condition relevant to his criminal conduct, the department may, with the permission of defendant, administer treatment for such condition. If such treatment will require a longer period of confinement than the period for which defendant was placed in the diagnostic facility, the Director of Corrections may file with the court which placed defendant in the facility a petition for extension of the period of confinement, to which shall be attached a writing signed by defendant giving his consent to the extension. If the court finds the petition and consent in order, it may order the extension, and transmit a copy of the order to the Director of Corrections.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 165.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.044.

(a) (1) In instances where a defendant is charged with a controlled substance offense and granted probation, the court shall order a drug treatment program or drug education pursuant to Section 11373 of the Health and Safety Code if an appropriate program with capacity to accept the defendant has been identified by the probation officer.

(2) If, at any point during the probation period, evidence is presented that the defendant is not in compliance with the treatment program or education, the court may revoke probation and, upon a determination that the defendant has willfully failed to comply with the treatment program or education, impose
 a new grant of probation pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 1203.2.

(3) When referring a person pursuant to this subdivision, the court shall determine the person’s ability to pay. If the court finds that the person is financially unable to pay, the court shall develop a sliding fee schedule for the program based on the person’s ability to pay. A person who meets the criteria set forth in Section 68632 of the Government Code shall not be responsible for any costs.

(b) For purposes of this section,
 “drug treatment program” means a state-licensed or state-certified community drug treatment program, which may include one or more of the following: drug education, outpatient services, narcotic replacement therapy, residential treatment, detoxification services, and aftercare services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 1007, Sec. 1.   (AB 2106)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.045.

(a) Except in unusual cases where the interests of justice would best be served if the person is granted probation, probation shall not be granted to any person convicted of a crime of theft of an amount exceeding one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).

(b) The fact that the theft was of an amount exceeding one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) shall be alleged in the accusatory pleading, and either admitted by the defendant in open court, or found to be true by the jury trying the issue of guilt or by the court where guilt is established by plea of guilty or nolo contendere or by trial by the court sitting without a jury.

(c) When probation is granted, the court shall specify on the record and shall enter on the minutes the circumstances indicating that the interests of justice would best be served by such a disposition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 327, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.046.

(a) Except in unusual cases where the interests of justice would best be served if the person is granted probation, probation shall not be granted to any person who is convicted of violating Section 653j by using, soliciting, inducing, encouraging, or intimidating a minor to commit a felony in violation of that section.

(b) When probation is granted pursuant to subdivision (a), the court shall specify on the record and shall enter into the minutes the circumstances indicating that the interests of justice would best be served by that disposition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 897, Sec. 37.5.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.047.

A person convicted of a violation of paragraph (1), (2), (4), or (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 502, or of a felony violation of paragraph (3), (6), (7), or (8) of subdivision (c) of Section 502, or a violation of subdivision (b) of Section 502.7 may be granted probation, but, except in unusual cases where the ends of justice would be better served by a shorter period, the period of probation shall not be less than three years and the following terms shall be imposed. During the period of probation, that person shall not accept employment where that person would use a computer connected by any means to any other computer, except upon approval of the court and notice to and opportunity to be heard by the prosecuting attorney, probation department, prospective employer, and the convicted person. Court approval shall not be given unless the court finds that the proposed employment would not pose a risk to the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1357, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.048.

(a) Except in unusual cases where the interests of justice would best be served if the person is granted probation, probation shall not be granted to any person convicted of a violation of Section 502 or subdivision (b) of Section 502.7 involving the taking of or damage to property with a value exceeding one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).

(b) The fact that the value of the property taken or damaged was an amount exceeding one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) shall be alleged in the accusatory pleading, and either admitted by the defendant in open court, or found to be true by the jury trying the issue of guilt or by the court where guilt is established by plea of guilt or nolo contendere or by trial by the court sitting without a jury.

(c) When probation is granted, the court shall specify on the record and shall enter on the minutes the circumstances indicating that the interests of justice would best be served by such a disposition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1357, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.049.

(a) Except in unusual cases where the interest of justice would best be served if the person is granted probation, probation shall not be granted to any person who violates subdivision (f) or (g) of Section 10980 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, when the violation has been committed by means of the electronic transfer of CalFresh benefits, and the amount of the electronically transferred CalFresh benefits exceeds one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).

(b) The fact that the violation was committed by means of an electronic transfer of CalFresh benefits and the amount of the electronically transferred CalFresh benefits exceeds one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) shall be
 alleged in the accusatory pleading, and either admitted by the defendant in open court, or found to be true by the jury trying the issue of guilt or by the court where guilt is established by a plea of guilty or nolo contendere or by trial by the court sitting without a jury.

(c) If probation is granted, the court shall specify on the record and shall enter on the minutes the circumstances indicating that the interests of justice would best be served by that disposition of the case.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 227, Sec. 16.   (AB 1400)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.05.

Any report of the probation officer filed with the court, including any report arising out of a previous arrest of the person who is the subject of the report, may be inspected or copied only as follows:

(a) By any person, from the date judgment is pronounced or probation granted or, in the case of a report arising out of a previous arrest, from the date the subsequent accusatory pleading is filed, to and including 60 days from the date judgment is pronounced or probation is granted, whichever is earlier.

(b) By any person, at any time, by order of the court, upon filing a petition therefor by the person.

(c) By the general public, if the court upon its own motion orders that a report or reports shall be open or that the contents of the report or reports shall be disclosed.

(d) By any person authorized or required by law to inspect or receive copies of the report.

(e) By the district attorney of the county at any time.

(f) By the subject of the report at any time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 128, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.055.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, in sentencing a person convicted of committing or of attempting to commit one or more of the offenses listed in subdivision (b) against a person who is a passenger, operator, driver, or other occupant of any public transit vehicle whether the offense or attempt is committed within the vehicle or directed at the vehicle, the court shall require that the person serve some period of confinement. If probation is granted, it shall be a condition of probation that the person shall be confined in the county jail for some period of time. If the time spent in jail prior to arraignment is less than 24 hours, it shall not be considered to satisfy the requirement that some period of confinement be imposed.

(2) As
 used in this subdivision, “public transit vehicle” means a motor vehicle, streetcar, trackless trolley, bus, shuttle, light rail system, rapid transit system, subway, train, taxicab, or jitney that transports members of the public for hire.

(b) Subdivision (a) applies to the following crimes:

(1) Murder.

(2) A violation of Section 241, 241.3, 241.4, 244, 245, 245.2, or 246.

(3) Robbery, in violation of Section 211.

(4) Kidnapping, in violation of Section 207.

(5) Kidnapping, in violation of Section 209.

(6) Battery, in violation of Section 243, 243.1, or
 243.3.

(7) Rape, in violation of Section 261, 264, or 264.1, or former Section 262.

(8) Assault with intent to commit rape or sodomy, in violation of Section 220.

(9) Any other offense in which the defendant inflicts great bodily injury on a person other than an accomplice. As used in this paragraph, “great bodily injury” has the same meaning as defined in Section 12022.7.

(10) Grand theft, in violation of subdivision (1) of Section 487.

(11) Throwing of a hard substance or shooting a missile at a transit vehicle, in violation of Section 219.2.

(12) Unlawfully causing a fire, in violation of Section 452.

(13) Drawing, exhibiting, or using a firearm or deadly weapon, in violation of Section 417.

(14) A violation of Section 214.

(15) A violation of Section 215.

(16) Kidnapping, in violation of Section 209.5.

(c) Probation shall not be granted to, nor shall the execution or imposition of sentence be suspended for, a person convicted of a felony offense falling within this section if the person has been previously convicted and sentenced pursuant to this section.

(d) (1) The existence of any fact that would make a person ineligible for probation under subdivisions (a) and (c) shall be alleged in the accusatory
 pleading, and either admitted by the defendant in open court, or found to be true by the jury trying the issue of guilt or by the court where guilt is established by a plea of guilty or nolo contendere or by a trial by the court sitting without a jury.

A finding bringing the defendant within this section shall not be stricken pursuant to Section 1385 or any law.

(2) This subdivision does not prohibit the adjournment of criminal proceedings pursuant to Division 3 (commencing with Section 3000) or Division 6 (commencing with Section 6000) of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(e) The court shall require, as a condition of probation for a person convicted of committing a crime that took place on a public transit vehicle, except when the court makes a finding and states on the record clear and compelling reasons why the condition would be
 inappropriate, that the person make restitution to the victim. If restitution is found to be inappropriate, the court shall require as a condition of probation, except when the court makes a finding and states on the record its reasons that the condition would be inappropriate, that the defendant perform specified community service. This subdivision does not limit the authority of a court to provide additional conditions of probation.

(f) When a person is convicted of committing a crime that took place on a public transit vehicle, the probation officer shall immediately investigate and report to the court at a specified time whether, as a result of the crime, property damage or loss or personal injury was caused by the defendant, the amount of the damage, loss, or injury, and the feasibility of requiring restitution to be made by the defendant. When a probation report is required pursuant to Section 1203 the information required by this
 subdivision shall be added to that probation report.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 197, Sec. 20.   (SB 1493)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.06.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, probation shall not be granted to, nor shall the execution or imposition of sentence be suspended for, nor shall a finding bringing the defendant within this section be stricken pursuant to Section 1385 for, any of the following persons:
